Hawaii, session 2026, GM1251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that section 844D-126,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, appears to require all evidence
custodians in all post-conviction cases to retain all evidence
that "may" contain biological evidence. As a result, evidence
must be retained in all felony, misdemeanor, petty misdemeanor,
and violation cases resulting in conviction, even when the
actual presence of biological evidence is extremely unlikely;
even when that evidence would have been irrelevant to the
identification of the perpetrator; and even when the identity of
the perpetrator was not at issue.
The legislature further finds that this broad evidence
retention requirement has caused storage problems statewide.
Reasonable guidelines and limitations for the post-conviction
retention of biological evidence by law enforcement agencies and
the courts are needed, as well as a clear procedure that allows
defendants to object to the proposed disposal of biological
evidence.
2026-2443 SB3073 GDI SMA.docx

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
The purpose of this Act is to establish a more practical
and balanced framework for post-conviction evidence retention
by:
(1) Limiting mandatory post-conviction evidence retention
to certain serious felony offenses in which the
identity of the perpetrator was a contested issue and
the evidence could reasonably be determined to contain
biological material that could be used for DNA
analysis to identify or exclude the defendant as the
perpetrator;
(2) Allowing the disposal of evidence, upon court
approval, before the exhaustion of all appeals or
completion of a sentence in cases in which the
identity of the perpetrator was not a contested issue
or the evidence does not contain biological material
that could reasonably be used for DNA analysis to
identify or exclude the defendant as the perpetrator;
(3) Providing defendants with an opportunity to object to
the proposed disposal of evidence; and
(4) Authorizing the court, upon motion of a defendant or
prosecutor or on the court's own motion, to order the
2026-2443 SB3073 GDI SMA.docx 2
liiiiniiiiiiiiiiiNiiiiiiiiiiD

Page 3
S.B. NO.
2^1
C.D. 1
retention of biological evidence in felony cases for a
certain period under specified circumstances.
SECTION 2. Section 844D-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted
and to read as follows:
""Contested issue in the case" means, as reflected in the
record, the defendant affirmatively disputed being the
perpetrator of the charged offense by raising or relying on
misidentification, alibi, mistaken identity, third-party
perpetrator, or similar theory, or by otherwise placing the
perpetrator's identity in issue through motion, argument, cross-
examination, evidence, or proffer."
SECTION 3. Section 844D-121, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"S844D-121 Petition fox post-conviction DNA testing.
Notwithstanding any other law or rule of court governing post­
conviction relief to the contrary, a person who was convicted of
and sentenced for a crime, or acquitted of a crime on the ground
of physical or mental disease, disorder, or defect excluding
responsibility, may file a motion, at any time, for DNA analysis
of any evidence that:
2026-2443 SB3073 CDl SMA.docx

Page 4
S.B. NO.
2^1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(1) Is in the custody or control of a [police dopartmont, j
law enforcement agency, prosecuting [attorney,]
agency, laboratory, or court [^^], consistent with
section 844D-126;
(2) Is related to the investigation or prosecution that
resulted in the judgment of conviction or of acquittal
of a crime on the ground of physical or mental
disease, disorder, or defect excluding responsibility;
and
(3) [May contain] Contains biological evidence[—] that
could reasonably be used for DNA analysis to:
(A) Establish the identity of the person who
committed the offense that resulted in the
judgment of conviction; or
(B) Exclude a person from the group of persons who
could have committed the offense that resulted in
the judgment of conviction."
SECTION 4. Section 844D-126, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-tl §844D-126 [-3-] Retention of biological evidence. (a)
[Ait] An^r evidence in the custody or control of an evidence
2026-2443 SB3073 CDl SMA.docx

Pages
S.B. NO.
2^1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
custodian, including a [police department,] law enforcement
agency, prosecuting [attorney/] agency, laboratory, or court
[that], shall be retained if;
(1) The identity of the defendant, as the perpetrator of
the offense that resulted in the judgment of
conviction, was a contested issue in the case;
(2) The evidence is related to the investigation or
prosecution of a case in which there has been a
judgment of conviction [and—feh-at-may] for;
(A) Murder;
(B) Manslaughter;
(C) Kidnapping;
(D) Sexual assault in the first degree;
(E) Sexual assault in the second degree;
(F) Assault in the first degree; or
(G) An attempt or criminal conspiracy to commit any
of the offenses set forth in this paragraph; and
(3) The evidence could reasonably be determined to contain
biological evidence that could be used for DNA
analysis to;
2026-2443 SB3073 GDI SMA.docx 5
iiiHiiiiiwniiiiiiiiininiii

Page 6
S.B. NO. 2?,
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(A) Establish the identity of the person who
conunitted the offense that resulted in the
jud2ment of conyiction2 or
(B) Exclude a person from the group of persons who
could have committed the offense that resulted in
the judgment of conviction.
(b) The evidence retained pursuant to subsection (a) shall
be retained at least until the later occurring of either:
(1) The exhaustion of all appeals of the case to which the
evidence is related; or
(2) The completion of any sentence, including any term of
probation or parole, imposed on the defendant in the
case to which the evidence relates.
-- The attorney general shall cotablioh procodurGa and
peeteeeie-;—whi-ch shall- be uniform throughout the State,—for the
Golloetion and preservation of evidence retained pttr-suan-t- -fee
thio section.]
(c) The evidence custodian may dispose of evidence
retained pursuant to subsection (a) before the expiration of the
time period specified in subsection (b) if:
2026-2443 SB3073 CDl SMA.docx 6
iiNiiiiniiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiHi

Page 7 3073
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(1) The court, pursuant to stibsection (g) , grants a motion
for disposal of evidence filed by the prosecuting
agency before sentencing and scheduled to be heard by
the court immediately after sentencing or as soon
thereafter as practicable; provided that the motion
for disposal shall include a description of the
evidence proposed for disposal; or
(2) The prosecuting agency or evidence custodian files
with the court a notification of proposed disposal of
evidence consistent with this section, and either:
(A) The defendant does not file a statement of
objection pursuant to subsection (f); or
(B) If the defendant files a statement of objection
pursuant to subsection (f), the court, after a
hearing on the objection, allows disposal of the
evidence pursuant to subsection (g).
(d) If a notification of proposed disposal of the evidence
is filed, a copy shall be served upon:
(1) The defendant against whom the judgment of conviction
was entered, by personal service or, after a
reasonable and documented good faith attempt for
2026-2443 SB3073 GDI SMA.docx
lilllllHIBIIIHIIBinHII

Page 8 S.B. NO. 2^1
C.D. 1
personal service was made, by first-class mail to the
defendant's last known address;
(2) The defendant's parole or probation officer, if
service cannot be made upon the defendant by personal
service and the defendant remains under parole or
probation supervision;
(3) The defendant's attorney of record, if applicable;
(4) The prosecuting agency, if that agency did not file
the notification; and
(5) The evidence custodian, if the evidence custodian did
not file the notification.
(e) The notification of proposed disposal of the evidence
shall include;
(1) A description of the evidence proposed for disposal;
ar^
(2) Notice that the evidence custodian may dispose of the
evidence before the expiration of the time period
specified in subsection (b) unless, within ninety days
of service of the notification, the defendant files a
written statement of objection with the court and
2026-2443 SB3073 GDI SMA.docx 8
iiiiniiiiiiiiiiHiiiiiiiiinii

Page 9 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
serves the statement of objection on the prosecuting
agency and the evidence custodian.
(f) If, within ninety days of service of the notification
of proposed disposal of the evidence on the defendant, the
defendant's parole or probation officer, or the defendant's
attorney of record, whichever service is completed last, the
defendant files a written statement of objection with the court
and serves the statement of objection on the prosecuting agency
and the evidence custodian, the court shall schedule a hearing
on the objection and provide notice of the hearing to the
prosecuting agency and the evidence custodian.
(g) If, after a hearing on a motion for disposal of
evidence or a hearing on the objection to a notification of
proposed disposal of the evidence, the court determines by a
preponderance of the evidence that:
(1) The identity of the defendant, as the perpetrator of
the offense that resulted in the judgment of
conviction, was not a contested issue in the case; or
(2) The evidence does not contain biological evidence that
could reasonably be used for DNR analysis to:
2026-2443 SB3073 GDI SMA.docx
imiiiiiiiiiiBiniHiiiiiiiiNii

Page 10
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(A) Establish the identity of the person who
committed the offense for which the defendant was
convicted; or
2^ Exclude a person from the group of persons who
could have committed the offense for which the
defendant was convicted,
the court may allow the evidence custodian to dispose of the
evidence.
(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
upon the motion of a defendant or prosecutor or on the court's
own motion, the court may order retention of biological evidence
in any felony case for the period otherwise required under this
chapter if the court finds, based on the record, that;
(1) Biological evidence exists or was collected in the
case; and
(2) Biological evidence could reasonably be material to
establishing or disproving the identity of the
perpetrator.
(i) For the purposes of this section, "biological
evidence" means an individual's blood, semen, hair, saliva, skin
tissue, fingernail scrapings, teeth, bone, bodily fluids, or
2026-2443 SB3073 GDI SMA.docx 10
NllliHOmilHllllilllHIIIII

Page 11 3073
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
other identifiable biological material, including the contents
of a sexua2 a^sault e2£amination ki^"
SECTION 5. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect on September 1,
2026.
2026-2443 SB3073 CDl SMA.docx
inMiiiiiiuniiiiiiiiMUH

3073
S.B. NO
w
b
:□o
b o
APPROVED this 25th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I

S.B. No. 3073, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 1,2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
14-26

SB No. 3073, SD 1, HD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives